Illinois, session 104th, SB2855.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Voluntary Payroll Deductions Act of 1983 is 5amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 340/3)  (from Ch. 15, par. 503)7    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act unless the 8context otherwise requires:9    (a) "Employee" means any regular officer or employee who 10receives salary or wages for personal services rendered to the 11State of Illinois, and includes an individual hired as an 12employee by contract with that individual.13    (b) "Qualified organization" means an organization 14representing one or more benefiting agencies, which 15organization is designated by the State Comptroller as 16qualified to receive payroll deductions under this Act. An 17organization desiring to be designated as a qualified 18organization shall:19        (1) Submit written or electronic designations on forms 20    approved by the State Comptroller by 500 or more employees 21    or State annuitants, in which such employees or State 22    annuitants indicate that the organization is one for which 23    the employee or State annuitant intends to authorize   SB2855- 2 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1    withholding. The forms shall require the name, last 4 2    digits only of the social security number, and employing 3    State agency for each employee. Upon notification by the 4    Comptroller that such forms have been approved, the 5    organization shall, within 30 days, notify in writing the 6    Comptroller or his or her designee of its intention to 7    obtain the required number of designations. Such 8    organization shall have 12 months from that date to obtain 9    the necessary designations and return to the State 10    Comptroller's office the completed designations, which 11    shall be subject to verification procedures established by 12    the State Comptroller;13        (2) Certify that all benefiting agencies are tax 14    exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 15    Code;16        (3) Certify that all benefiting agencies are in 17    compliance with the Illinois Human Rights Act;18        (4) Certify that all benefiting agencies are in 19    compliance with the Charitable Trust Act and the 20    Solicitation for Charity Act;21        (5) Certify that all benefiting agencies actively 22    conduct health or welfare programs and provide services to 23    individuals directed at one or more of the following 24    common human needs within a community: service, research, 25    and education in the health fields; family and child care 26    services; protective services for children and adults;   SB2855- 3 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1    services for children and adults in foster care; services 2    related to the management and maintenance of the home; day 3    care services for adults; transportation services; 4    information, referral and counseling services; services to 5    eliminate illiteracy; the preparation and delivery of 6    meals; adoption services; emergency shelter care and 7    relief services; disaster relief services; safety 8    services; neighborhood and community organization 9    services; recreation services; social adjustment and 10    rehabilitation services; health support services; or a 11    combination of such services designed to meet the special 12    needs of specific groups, such as children and youth, the 13    ill and infirm, and persons with physical disabilities; 14    and that all such benefiting agencies provide the above 15    described services to individuals and their families in 16    the community and surrounding area in which the 17    organization conducts its fund drive, or that such 18    benefiting agencies provide relief to victims of natural 19    disasters and other emergencies on a where and as needed 20    basis;21        (6) Certify that the organization has disclosed the 22    percentage of the organization's total collected receipts 23    from employees or State annuitants that are distributed to 24    the benefiting agencies and the percentage of the 25    organization's total collected receipts from employees or 26    State annuitants that are expended for fund-raising and   SB2855- 4 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1    overhead costs. These percentages shall be the same 2    percentage figures annually disclosed by the organization 3    to the Attorney General. The disclosure shall be made to 4    all solicited employees and State annuitants and shall be 5    in the form of a factual statement on all petitions and in 6    the campaign's brochures for employees and State 7    annuitants;8        (7) Certify that all benefiting agencies receiving 9    funds which the employee or State annuitant has requested 10    or designated for distribution to a particular community 11    and surrounding area use a majority of such funds 12    distributed for services in the actual provision of 13    services in that community and surrounding area;14        (8) Certify that neither it nor its member 15    organizations will solicit State employees for 16    contributions at their workplace, except pursuant to this 17    Act and the rules promulgated thereunder. Each qualified 18    organization, and each participating United Fund, is 19    encouraged to cooperate with all others and with all State 20    agencies and educational institutions so as to simplify 21    procedures, to resolve differences and to minimize costs;22        (9) Certify that it will pay its share of the campaign 23    costs and will comply with the Code of Campaign Conduct as 24    approved by the Comptroller or other agency as designated 25    by the Comptroller; and26        (10) Certify that it maintains a year-round office,   SB2855- 5 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1    the telephone number, and person responsible for the 2    operations of the organization in Illinois. That 3    information shall be provided to the State Comptroller at 4    the time the organization is seeking participation under 5    this Act.6    Each qualified organization shall submit to the State 7Comptroller between January 1 and March 1 of each year, a 8statement that the organization is in compliance with all of 9the requirements set forth in paragraphs (2) through (10). The 10State Comptroller shall exclude any organization that fails to 11submit the statement from the next solicitation period.12    In order to be designated as a qualified organization, the 13organization shall have existed at least 2 years prior to 14submitting the written or electronic designation forms 15required in paragraph (1) and shall certify to the State 16Comptroller that such organization has been providing services 17described in paragraph (5) in Illinois. If the organization 18seeking designation represents more than one benefiting 19agency, it need not have existed for 2 years but shall certify 20to the State Comptroller that each of its benefiting agencies 21has existed for at least 2 years prior to submitting the 22written or electronic designation forms required in paragraph 23(1) and that each has been providing services described in 24paragraph (5) in Illinois.25    Organizations which have met the requirements of this Act 26shall be permitted to participate in the State and   SB2855- 6 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1Universities Combined Appeal as of January 1st of the year 2immediately following their approval by the Comptroller.3    Where the certifications described in paragraphs (2), (3), 4(4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (10) above are made by an 5organization representing more than one benefiting agency they 6shall be based upon the knowledge and belief of such qualified 7organization. Any qualified organization shall immediately 8notify the State Comptroller in writing if the qualified 9organization receives information or otherwise believes that a 10benefiting agency is no longer in compliance with the 11certification of the qualified organization. A qualified 12organization representing more than one benefiting agency 13shall thereafter withhold and refrain from distributing to 14such benefiting agency those funds received pursuant to this 15Act until the benefiting agency is again in compliance with 16the qualified organization's certification. The qualified 17organization shall immediately notify the State Comptroller of 18the benefiting agency's resumed compliance with the 19certification, based upon the qualified organization's 20knowledge and belief, and shall pay over to the benefiting 21agency those funds previously withheld.22    In order to qualify, a qualified organization must receive 23250 deduction pledges from the immediately preceding 24solicitation period as set forth in Section 6. The Comptroller 25shall, by February 1st of each year, so notify any qualified 26organization that failed to receive the minimum deduction   SB2855- 7 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1requirement. The notification shall give such qualified 2organization until March 1st to provide the Comptroller with 3documentation that the minimum deduction requirement has been 4met. On the basis of all the documentation, the Comptroller 5shall, by March 15th of each year, make publicly available a 6list of all organizations which have met the minimum payroll 7deduction requirement. Only those organizations which have met 8such requirements, as well as the other requirements of this 9Section, shall be permitted to solicit State employees or 10State annuitants for voluntary contributions, and the 11Comptroller shall discontinue withholding for any such 12organization which fails to meet these requirements, except 13qualified organizations that received deduction pledges during 14the 2004 solicitation period are deemed to be qualified for 15the 2005 solicitation period.16    On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 17the 104th General Assembly, a qualified community foundation 18that has been approved by the Department of Revenue to issue 19certificates of receipt under the Illinois Gives Tax Credit 20Act shall automatically be considered a qualified organization 21without the necessity of complying with the provisions of this 22subsection (b). 23    (c) "United Fund" means the organization conducting the 24single, annual, consolidated effort to secure funds for 25distribution to agencies engaged in charitable and public 26health, welfare and services purposes, which is commonly known   SB2855- 8 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1as the United Fund, or the organization which serves in place 2of the United Fund organization in communities where an 3organization known as the United Fund is not organized.4    In order for a United Fund to participate in the State and 5Universities Employees Combined Appeal, it shall comply with 6the provisions of paragraph (9) of subsection (b).7    (d) "State and Universities Employees Combined Appeal", 8otherwise known as "SECA", means the State-directed joint 9effort of all of the qualified organizations, together with 10the United Funds, for the solicitation of voluntary 11contributions from State and University employees and State 12annuitants.13    (e) "Retirement system" means any or all of the following: 14the General Assembly Retirement System, the State Employees' 15Retirement System of Illinois, the State Universities 16Retirement System, the Teachers' Retirement System of the 17State of Illinois, and the Judges Retirement System.18    (f) "State annuitant" means a person receiving an annuity 19or disability benefit under Article 2, 14, 15, 16, or 18 of the 20Illinois Pension Code.21(Source: P.A. 102-291, eff. 8-6-21.) 22    Section 10. The Illinois Gives Tax Credit Act is amended 23by changing Section 170-10 as follows: 24    (35 ILCS 60/170-10)  SB2855- 9 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1    Sec. 170-10. Tax credit awards; limitations. 2    (a) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2025 3and ending before December 31, 2030, the Department shall 4award, in accordance with this Act, income tax credits to 5taxpayers who provide an endowment gift to a permanent 6endowment fund during the taxable year and receive a 7certificate of receipt under Section 170-15 for that gift, 8including, but not limited to, an endowment gift made to a 9permanent endowment fund under the provisions of the Voluntary 10Payroll Deductions Act of 1983. Subject to the limitations in 11this Section, the amount of the credit that may be awarded to a 12taxpayer by the Department under this Act is an amount equal to 1325% of the endowment gift. For the purposes of this Section, 14taxpayers filing a joint return shall be considered one 15taxpayer. 16    (b) The aggregate amount of all Illinois Gives tax credits 17awarded by the Department under this Act in any calendar year 18may not exceed $5,000,000.19    (c) The aggregate amount of all Illinois Gives tax credits 20that the Department may award to any taxpayer under this Act in 21any calendar year may not exceed $100,000 for taxpayers who 22are not spouses filing a joint return or $200,000 for 23taxpayers who are spouses filing a joint return.24    (d) The amount of contributions to any specific qualified 25community foundation that are eligible for Illinois Gives tax 26credits under this Section in any calendar year shall not   SB2855- 10 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1exceed $3,000,000.2    (e) Of the annual amount available for tax credits, 25% 3must be reserved for endowment gifts that do not exceed the 4small gift maximum set forth in this subsection. The small 5gift maximum is $25,000. For purposes of determining if a 6donation meets the small gift maximum, the amount of the 7credit authorization certificate under Section 170-15 shall be 8used.9    (f) For the purpose of this Section, a credit is 10considered to be awarded on the date the Department issues an 11approved contribution authorization certificate under Section 12170-15.13(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 14    Section 15. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 15adding Section 246 as follows: 16    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)17    Sec. 246. Volunteer tax credit.18    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 192026 and beginning prior to January 1, 2031, each individual 20who (i) serves as a volunteer for 100 hours during the taxable 21year, (ii) does not receive any compensation for his or her 22services as a volunteer for the taxable year, and (iii) does 23not serve on a full-time or part-time career basis for the 24entity for which he or she volunteers may apply to the   SB2855- 11 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1Department for a credit against the taxes imposed by 2subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201. The amount of the 3credit shall be $500 per eligible individual. The aggregate 4amount of all tax credits awarded by the Department under this 5Section in any calendar year may not exceed $5,000,000. 6Credits shall be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis. 7    (b) A credit under this Section may not reduce a 8taxpayer's liability to less than zero. 9    (c) By January 24 of each year, entities that are 10organized and operated exclusively for charitable, religious, 11or educational purposes and possess an active Exemption 12Identification Number issued by the Department pursuant to the 13Retailers' Occupation Tax Act must notify the Department of 14volunteers who (i) volunteered for at least 100 hours during 15the immediately preceding calendar year and (ii) did not 16receive compensation for their services as a volunteer during 17the immediately preceding calendar year. Notification shall be 18submitted in the manner specified by the Department. 19    (d) The Department shall adopt rules to implement and 20administer this Section, including rules concerning 21applications for the tax credit. 22    (e) As used in this Section, "volunteer" means a person 23who serves, other than on a full-time career basis, for an 24entity that is organized and operated exclusively for 25charitable, religious, or educational purposes and who possess 26an active Exemption Identification Number issued by the   SB2855- 12 -LRB104 15565 HLH 28731 b1Department of Revenue pursuant to the Retailers' Occupation 2Tax Act.  3    Section 20. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 4amended by adding Section 5-45.70 as follows: 5    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.70 new)6    Sec. 5-45.70. Emergency rulemaking; Illinois Income Tax 7Act. To provide for the expeditious and timely implementation 8of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, 9emergency rules implementing Section 246 of the Illinois 10Income Tax Act may be adopted in accordance with Section 5-45 11by the Department of Revenue. The adoption of emergency rules 12authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to be 13necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.14    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 15of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.